Illinois, session 104th, SB4053.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the University of Illinois for the purpose of 7increasing the extension service trust fund allocation for the 8University of Illinois Extension program. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.